Hawaii statutes.
[§161-13] Application for a license.
The board may issue licenses to poultry slaughterhouses and poultry processing
establishments having certificates of sanitation issued under section 161-11.
An applicant for an original or renewal license to operate as a poultry
slaughterhouse operator or poultry processor shall file an application upon a
form prepared by the board, containing such information which the board deems
necessary for the administration of this chapter.

The license year shall be from July 1 to
the following June 30. All applications for renewal of licenses must be
made at least thirty days before the commencement of the license year. [L 1969,
c 212, §9]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next